apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="абод/ва__num"> <!-- FIX -->
      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вум</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вума</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вум</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вума</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вум</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вума</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вух</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>зве</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюх</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюм</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зве</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюх</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюма</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>звюх</l><r>ва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="тр/ы__num">
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ох</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ох</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыма</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="чатыр/ы__num">
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ох</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ох</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ма</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ох</l><r>ы<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="пяц/ь__num">
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r>ь<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r>ь<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>цю</l><r>ь<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="с/орак__num">
      <e><p><l>орак</l><r>орак<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>арака</l><r>орак<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>арака</l><r>орак<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>орако</l><r>орак<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>арака</l><r>орак<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>арака</l><r>орак<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>арака</l><r>орак<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дзевяноста__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ст/о__num">
      <e><p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <pardef n="BASE__nmsg1">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__nmsg2">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__nmsg3">
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="тры"><i>тр</i><par n="тр/ы__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чатыры"><i>чатыр</i><par n="чатыр/ы__num"/></e>
    <e lm="пяць"><i>пяц</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шэсць"><i>шэсц</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дзевяць"><i>дзевяц</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дзесяць"><i>дзесяц</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="адзінаццаць"><i>адзінаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дванаццаць"><i>дванаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="трынаццаць"><i>трынаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чатырнаццаць"><i>чатырнаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="пятнаццаць"><i>пятнаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шаснаццаць"><i>шаснаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="семнаццаць"><i>семнаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="васемнаццаць"><i>васемнаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дзевятнаццаць"><i>дзевятнаццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дваццаць"><i>дваццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="трыццаць"><i>трыццац</i><par n="пяц/ь__num"/></e>
    <e lm="сорак"><i>с</i><par n="с/орак__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дзевяноста"><i>дзевяноста</i><par n="дзевяноста__num"/></e>
    <e lm="сто"><i>ст</i><par n="ст/о__num"/></e>
    <e lm="абодва"><i>абод</i><par n="абод/ва__num"/></e>
